Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202675-386
Division of Motor Carrier Services; duties.

The Division of Motor Carrier Services shall:

(1) Foster, promote, and preserve the motor carrier industry of the State of Nebraska;

(2) Protect and promote the public health and welfare of the citizens of the state by ensuring that the motor carrier industry is operated in an efficient and safe manner;

(3) Promote and provide for efficient and uniform governmental oversight of the motor carrier industry;

(4) Promote financial responsibility on the part of motor carriers operating in and through the State of Nebraska;

(5) Administer all provisions of the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act, the International Registration Plan Act, and the unified carrier registration plan and agreement pursuant to sections 75-392 to 75-3,100;

(6) Provide for the issuance of certificates of title to apportioned registered motor vehicles as provided for by subsection (6) of section 60-144; and

(7) Carry out such other duties and responsibilities as directed by the Legislature.

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 563, § 41;

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 110;

Laws 2005, LB 284, § 4;

Laws 2007, LB358, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB331, § 18;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 82.

International Fuel Tax Agreement Act, see section 66-1401.

International Registration Plan Act, see section 60-3,192.